<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR88610-0004 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-10-88.f2.A1003</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="69"><ITAG tagnum="18">Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">9 CFR Part 92 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 88-057] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Importation of Sheep </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, USDA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>We are amending the regulations concerning the importationof sheep into the United States. This is necessary because there is considerableinterest in importing large numbers of sheep into the United States fromNew Zealand. These anticipated importations of sheep have created a demandfor quarantine services for sheep in excess of the services available atexisting federal facilities. First, we are adding requirements for approval of privately operated quarantinefacilities for sheep imported into the United States from countries freeof foot-and-mouth disease and rinderpest. These amendments are needed toensure that private facilities meet minimum standards for disease control.Second, we indicate the ports of entry for sheep intended for quarantineat a privately operated quarantine facility. This amendment is needed toensure that these sheep are entered into the United States only at portsat which the appropriate federal personnel are available to provide services.Third, we are adding health certification requirements and other requirementsconcerning quarantine upon arrival in the United States for sheep fromNew Zealand. These amendments are needed to ensure protection against theintroduction into the United States of communicable livestock diseases.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>July 11, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT: </T2>Dr. Harvey A. Kryder, SeniorStaff Veterinarian, Import-Export and Emergency Planning Staff, Animaland Plant Health Inspection Service, U.S. Department of Agriculture, Room806, Federal Building, 6505 Belcrest Road, Hyattsville, MD 20782, 301-436-8695.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Background </ITAG>The regulations in 9 CFR Part 92 (referred to below as the regulations),among other things, regulate the importation into the United States ofspecified animals and animal products in order to prevent the introductioninto the United States of various livestock diseases. In the <T4>Federal Register </T4>of March 2, 1988 (53 FR 6656-6666, Docket No.88-009), we proposed to amend the regulations by: (1) Adding requirementsfor approval of privately operated quarantine facilities for sheep importedinto the United States from countries free of foot-and-mouth disease andrinderpest; (2) indicating the ports of entry for sheep intended for quarantineat a privately operated quarantine facility; and (3) adding health certificationrequirements and other requirements concerning quarantine upon arrivalin the United States for sheep from New Zealand. A document correctingtwo typographical errors was published in the <T4>Federal Register </T4>on March 14, 1988 (53 FR 8301).As announced in the proposal, two public hearings were held; one in Portland,Oregon, on March 15, 1988, and another in Washington, DC, on March 17,1988. Also, in the proposal we invited written comments and indicated thatconsideration would be given to comments postmarked or received on or beforeApril 1, 1988. Twenty-eight persons made statements at the first hearing;ten, at the second. Several persons who spoke at one or both of the publichearings also submitted written comments. Eighty written comments werereceived. Persons submitting either oral or written comments included afeedlot and slaughterhouse operator, sheep producers, animal breeding andveterinary consultants, importers and exporters of agricultural commodities,members of Congress, APHIS employees, and representatives of the New Zealandgovernment, wool growers' and other sheep producers' associations, animalprotection organizations, state departments of agriculture, livestock exporters'associations, the national association representing the meat packing andprocessing industries, other trade associations, a public port and a stateassociation of public ports, and other interested individuals. All comments have been carefully considered, and those that raised objectionsor suggested changes are discussed in this supplementary information. Exceptas explained below, we have adopted the provisions of the proposed ruleas a final rule for the reasons set forth in the proposal and in this document.<ITAG tagnum="84">Standards for Privately Operated Quarantine Facilities for Sheep </ITAG>Standards Not Limited to Portland Facility Earlier this year one shipment of sheep from New Zealand was imported intothe United States through a facility in Portland, Oregon, that was specificallyapproved for that importation. Several persons' comments are based on theirfamiliarity with the Portland facility. We emphasize, however, that thestandards for approval of a privately operated quarantine facility containedin the proposed rule were not designed solely for the Portland facility,but for any privately operated quarantine facility for sheep otherwiseeligible for entry into the United States. Opposition to Use of Privately Operated Facilities Several commenters objected to allowing the importation of sheep into theUnited States through privately operated quarantine facilities. They maintainedthat we are setting precedents for private quarantine facilities far belowpresent standards and that we should only allow use of government operatedquarantine facilities to avoid compromising our import rules. No changesare made based on these comments. No evidence has been presented to usthat establishes that implementing this final rule would present a significantrisk of introducing communicable livestock diseases. Further, based onthe rationale set forth in the proposal and in this document, it has beendetermined that sheep imported into the United States in compliance withthe provisions of this final rule and the other applicable provisions ofthe regulations would not present a significant risk of introducing communicablelivestock diseases. Quarantine Facility Standards Not Limited to Sheep From New Zealand New andSection; 92.45 contains requirements for approval of privately operatedquarantine facilities for sheep from all countries free of rinderpest andfoot-and-mouth disease (FMD). (The importation of certain animals, includingsheep, from countries not declared free of rinderpest and FMD is prohibitedexcept for specially authorized importations through the Harry S TrumanAnimal Import Center, a maximum security quarantine facility in FlemingKey, Florida.) Commenters asserted that, since the standards for thesefacilities are written for the importation of sheep from any country freefrom FMD and rinderpest, they are geared for the worst health status ofthese animals that is likely to be encountered in the range of supplyingcountries. These commenters suggested that, considering the animal healthstatus of sheep from New Zealand, the standards should be written specificallyfor that country in order to avoid penalizing its sheep exporters. No changesare made based on this comment. The standards contained in the final ruleapply to privately operated quarantine facilities housing any sheep otherwiseeligible for entry into the United States regardless of the country oforigin. The health certification requirements would differ depending onthe animal health status and the animal health programs in the countryof origin. Once it is determined that the sheep meet the health certificationrequirements and are eligible for entry through a privately operated quarantinefacility, the standards necessary to ensure that sheep in the facilitydo not present a risk of spreading communicable livestock diseases are,generally, uniform. Cooperative Agreement: andSection; 92.45(a) We proposed that a privately operated quarantine facility for sheep mustbe operated in accordance with a cooperative agreement executed by theoperator or other designated representative of the facility and by theAdministrator. Commenters suggested that the regulations should requirea cooperative agreement between the privately operated quarantine facilityand the state in which it is located. They also suggested, generally, thatstate officials should assume authority and responsibility co-equal andparallel to that of federal officials in all aspects of the operation ofprivately operated quarantine facilities for sheep. No changes are made based on these comments. The statutory mandate to establishand enforce regulations concerning the importation of certain animals,including sheep, is directed to the Secretary of Agriculture by federalanimal quarantine laws. Cooperation with the States is critical to thecontrol and eradication of animal diseases in the United States, and Animaland Plant Health Inspection Service (APHIS) employees work closely withState officials. However, the ultimate authority for regulating the importationof these animals rests with the federal government. This responsibilitycannot be delegated to the States. Availability of Personnel to Provide Services The proposed rule (andSection; 92.45(b)) provided that approval of any quarantinefacility shall be contingent upon a determination by the Administratorthat adequate personnel are available to provide services required by thefacility if approved. Commenters questioned whether adequate personnelwill be available to properly monitor privately operated quarantine facilitiesif there are budget cuts and administrative cutbacks. Our inclusion of this provision in the regulations acknowledges that theremay be instances in which the Administrator will determine that adequateAPHIS personnel are not available to provide services and will have torefuse approval of a facility for that reason. However, this should notpreclude the Agency from having a mechanism in place to facilitate theimportation of animals for those importations for which personnel are available.Supervision of the Facility: andSection; 92.45(b)(1)We also proposed that the facility must be maintained under the supervisionof a Veterinary Services veterinarian. One commenter requested that thecomplete range of the supervisory veterinarian's authority be specifiedin detail. No changes are made based on this request. We think that this final ruleadequately identifies the range of the supervisory veterinarian's authority.As indicated in the proposed rule at 53 FR 6657, the requirement for supervisionis intended to ensure that the facility operates in accordance with allapplicable rules and regulations. It is the supervisory veterinarian'sresponsibility to exercise discretion and judgment within the frameworkof the regulations to ensure that the regulations are enforced. Of course,other supervisory personnel are available to advise on-line personnel asthey implement their responsibilities. Physical Plant Requirements: Location; andSection; 92.45(b)(2)(i) The proposed location requirements provided, in part, that the quarantinefacility must be located within the immediate area of the port of entryto minimize the possibility of introduction and dissemination of diseasesby the imported sheep while in transit from the point of entry to the quarantinefacility. One commenter suggested that we specify a distance that the facility mustbe located from domestic livestock in order to help ensure the biosecurityof the facility. We have determined that the facility should be located at least \1/2\ milefrom any livestock to help ensure the biosecurity of the facility. Althoughit is impossible to specify an exact minimum distance beyond which a diseaseagent could not be spread, both science and experience indicate that adistance of at least \1/2\ mile should be adequate to help preclude thetransmission of any animal disease agent into or from the facility. Wehave added this \1/2\ mile requirement to the final rule. Several other commenters requested that the regulations be more specificon the distance allowed between the port of entry and the facility. Nochanges are made based on this comment. Under andSection; 92.3(j) of thefinal rule, sheep may be entered into the United States through a numberof ports. Some of these ports will be in large metropolitan areas withthe nearest concentration of livestock many miles away. Others may be intowns with rural areas and concentrations of livestock within a very shortdistance of the port. Considering the diversity of the places in whichpersons may consider locating quarantine facilities, it is difficult tostipulate a maximum distance from the port of entry that would be ``withinthe immediate area of the port of entry.'' We would risk requiring whatmay in some circumstances prove unjustified and burdensome for the importeror, in other circumstances, finding that our regulations would allow constructionof a facility in a location that could prove inadequate to ensure preventionof disease spread. Prospective importers consult with APHIS officials inthe initial stages of considering construction of a privately operatedquarantine facility. Any importer will have an opportunity to check withagency officials to confirm that the location requirements would be metfor any facility before that person has made any firm decisions about thelocation of the facility. Physical Plant Requirements: Construction; andSection; 92.45(b)(2)(ii) <ITAG tagnum="81">_Walls, Floors, and Ceilings </ITAG>Paragraph (A) of the proposed construction requirements provided that allsolid walls, floors, and ceilings of the quarantine facility must be constructedof materials that are substantially impervious to moisture and that canwithstand continued cleaning and disinfection. Some commenters suggestedthat the requirement should only apply to the floors and to the walls upto a height of five feet, based on the assertion that only those surfaceswhich would be cleaned and disinfected between shipments and with whichthe sheep have direct contact would need to be impervious to moisture.In our judgment, all surfaces would need to be cleaned and disinfectedbetween shipments to help ensure that disease agents would not be spreadfrom one lot of sheep to another. The surfaces nearest the sheep wouldbe most likely to be contaminated by disease agents, with the risk of surfacecontamination decreasing with distance from the animals. Of course, thefloors and the lower part of the walls, with which the sheep, their excrement,or discharges have contact, would need more frequent or more intensivecleaning and disinfection. The upper part of the walls and the ceilingswould require considerably less maintenance to keep them clean and disinfected.We have determined that surfaces that require less maintenance, such asceilings and the upper part of the walls, would not need to be substantiallyimpervious to moisture in order to be adequately cleaned and disinfected.We are changing the provision in the final rule with respect to ceilingsand the upper part of the walls to require only that these surfaces mustbe able to withstand cleaning and disinfection between shipments. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Doors and Other Openings </ITAG>Paragraph (B) of the proposed construction requirements provided that thequarantine facility building must be constructed with each entryway equippedwith a series of two solid doors, and with other openings covered withscreening 16 mesh or finer, unless the Administrator specifically approvesother types of doors and openings as adequate to prevent the entry of insects.Some commenters suggested that there should be no requirement for screeningunless the animals quarantined in the facility originate from a countryaffected with known vector-borne diseases exotic to the United States.We disagree. As suggested by one commenter, even if the animals quarantinedin the facility originate from a country not known to be affected withvector-borne diseases exotic to the United States, screening would be neededto eliminate the risk of introduction of any vector-borne disease fromoutside the facility. The fact that the facility is screened would helpestablish that any vector-borne disease that might appear among the animalsin quarantine would be of foreign, rather than domestic, origin. Other commenters suggested that the 16 mesh or finer screening requirementis inappropriate, based on the assertion that it would create ventilationproblems that may cause greater health problems for the sheep in quarantinethan any potential problems that could be caused by insects. We rejectthe assertion that the screening requirement would cause ventilation problemsand jeopardize the health of the sheep in quarantine. The final rule containsseparate requirements to ensure adequate ventilation in a facility. Boththe ventilation and screening requirements are needed to help ensure thebiosecurity of the facility.With respect to the requirement that each entryway be equipped with a seriesof two solid doors, one commenter suggested specific circumstances underwhich double doors would not be needed. It is not necessary to make anyfurther change in the regulations to allow for approval of alternativetypes of doors and openings. As indicated above, the regulation as proposedprovided that the Administrator may specifically approve the use of othertypes of doors and openings. <ITAG tagnum="81">_``Lot'' </ITAG>The standards also contain provisions to ensure that disease agents wouldnot be spread among different lots of sheep within the same facility. Theterm ``lot'' first appears in paragraph (C) of the construction requirementsand is used several times in the standards. Several commenters requestedclarification of this term. The term ``lot'' was intended to mean a group of sheep that have been heldon a premises with opportunity for commingling (physical contact with othersheep in the group or with their excrement or discharges) at any time since30 days prior to export to the United States. We have included this clarificationin the final rule. Generally, for large importations of a group of feederlambs that have qualified for health certification during the same periodin an isolation area, a facility will house a single lot of animals. However,the regulations are written to allow a facility to accommodate more thanone lot of sheep at a time. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Ventilation Systems </ITAG>Paragraph (E) of the proposed construction requirements provided that thequarantine facility building must have a separate ventilation system foreach lot of sheep that is housed in the facility. One commenter assertedthat there would be no basis for this requirement as long as differentshipments of sheep are separated by physical barriers within the quarantinefacility. No changes are made based on this comment. We included this requirementto help eliminate the possibility of spread of airborne diseases, suchas ovine pneumonia, from one lot to another within the facility. If differentlots of sheep share a common ventilation system, separation of these lotsby physical barriers would not necessarily be adequate to prevent the spreadof airborne diseases from one lot to another. We have clarified paragraph(E) in the final rule by stipulating that the quarantine facility buildingmust have a separate, controlled, forced air ventilation system for eachlot of sheep housed in the facility if the facility is approved to handlemore than one lot of sheep. This is the type of ventilation system necessaryto help ensure that disease agents would not be spread among differentlots of sheep within the same facility. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Separate Feed Storage Area </ITAG>Paragraph (F) of the proposed construction requirements provided that thequarantine facility building must have a separate feed storage area. Onecommenter requested that this requirement be modified to allow for alternativemeans of receiving animal feed, such as delivery to the feeders by a systemof chutes or daily truck deliveries to the facility, as long as the truckis sufficiently disinfected. The requirement for a separate feed storage area was based on the premisethat a supply of feed would be stored in the facility. However, if arrangementsare made for an adequate supply of feed for the sheep without storing feedin the facility, a separate feed storage area would not be necessary. We have amended the proposed rule to allow for alternate means of receivingfeed in the facility. This revision includes a provision requiring thatany vehicle entering the quarantine facility building to deliver feed becleaned and disinfected under the supervision of a Veterinary Servicesinspector with a disinfectant authorized in andSection; 71.10 of Title 9,Code of Federal Regulations, immediately before entering and before leavingthe building. This is necessary to help prevent the spread of any diseaseagent into or from the quarantine facility building. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Standards for the Necropsy Area </ITAG>One commenter who is familiar with the facility in Portland, Oregon, assertedthat the proposed minimum standards applicable to the necropsy room wouldbe inadequate. He suggested additional requirements for more efficientventilation to get rid of noxious odors, floor drains with a minimum diameterof four inches, and adequately sloped floors to speed up drainage. No changes are made based on this comment. The final rule contains otherprovisions which, if properly enforced, will ensure the adequacy of theventilation system and control of surface drainage. Specifically, paragraph(E) of the construction requirements requires that the quarantine facilitybuilding have a ventilation capacity sufficient to control moisture andodor at levels that are not injurious to the health of the sheep in quarantine.Also, paragraph (H) of the sanitation and security requirements (andSection;92.45(b)(2)(iii)(H)) provides that arrangements shall exist for controlof surface drainage into or from the facility in a manner adequate to preventany significant risk of livestock diseases being spread into or from thefacility. While floor drains are not specifically required, they are astandard feature for the control of surface drainage from buildings suchas quarantine facilities. We are unable to substantiate that requiringthat these drains have a certain minimum diameter would ensure controlof surface drainage, since there are numerous other factors which alsoaffect surface drainage, such as the water table, the water pressure, theangles at which the pipes are placed, the number and location of drainopenings, and the frequency of cleaning manure and other excreta from thedrains. Physical Plant Requirements: Sanitation and Security; andSection; 92.45(b)(2)(iii)<ITAG tagnum="81">_Use of Disinfectants </ITAG>Paragraph (E) of the proposed sanitation and security requirements providedthat arrangements must exist for sufficient stocks of a disinfectant authorizedin andSection; 71.10 of Title 9, Code of Federal Regulations. One commenterobjected to this requirement. Apparently the commenter read this requirementas binding the operator of the facility to use of a single disinfectantproduct. This is not the case. Section 71.10 allows the use of a numberof disinfectants, all of which have bactericidal and virucidal properties.<ITAG tagnum="81">_Disposal of Wastes </ITAG>Paragraph (F) of the proposed sanitation and security requirements providedthat arrangements must exist at the facility for disposal of wastes byincineration or a public sewer system that meets all applicable environmentalquality control standards. Several commenters raised questions concerningthe feasibility of disposal of large amounts of manure by incinerationor disposal in a public sewer system. It was suggested that applicableenvironmental quality control standards might require burial of manurefrom the facility. We agree and have changed the rule to allow burial asan alternate means of disposal, if in conformance with all applicable environmentalquality control standards. Also, we note that andSection; 92.15 of the regulationsprohibits the removal of any manure from the facility until the releasefrom quarantine of the animals producing the manure. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Disposal of Sheep Carcasses </ITAG>Paragraph (G) of the proposed sanitation and security requirements providedthat arrangements must exist for disposal of sheep carcasses by incinerationor burial, in conformance with all applicable environmental quality controlstandards. Referring to the Portland facility, several commenters questionedwhether provisions had been made for the disposal of an entire shipmentof sheep in case that should become necessary. Other commenters suggestedthat our regulations should include specific requirements for disposalin the event of a disease outbreak in the facility. There is a site available for disposal of an entire shipment of sheep fromthe Portland facility in the unlikely event that it becomes necessary.As indicated in the regulation, the disposal is to be in conformance withall applicable environmental quality control standards. Those standardsare not within APHIS authority to set. To ensure that our agency is notassenting to or facilitating action not in conformance with environmentalquality control standards, we require that the operator of the facilityprovide a certification executed by an appropriate government officialindicating compliance with the applicable laws for environmental protection(andSection; 92.45(b)(4)).One commenter suggested that we could safely add an additional means ofcarcass disposal: refrigerated storage of any carcasses until the completionof the quarantine period, with disposal by rendering thereafter. We agree.Storing the sheep carcasses in the facility in a freezer at a temperaturebelow 20 degrees Fahrenheit would be adequate to avoid any risk of diseasespread from the carcasses. Scientific data indicate that grinding and thenheating sheep carcasses for at least one hour at a temperature of not lessthan 265 degrees Fahrenheit would be adequate to destroy any animal diseaseorganisms. We have added a provision to the final rule to allow renderingunder these conditions.  Some commenters asked that we modify the carcass disposal requirement toallow refrigeration of any carcasses until the end of the quarantine, andthen allow their disposal in any manner acceptable to local officials.These commenters asserted that there would be no basis for limiting themeans of disposal of sheep that died or were destroyed during the quarantineperiod once the other sheep in the same shipment have cleared quarantine.No changes are made based on these comments. While we are confident thatthese carcasses would not present a risk of introducing exotic diseasesinto the United States, not limiting their disposal to the options discussedabove could allow the spread of diseases such as salmonellosis. Decayinganimal tissue would rapidly attract vermin and become a source of infectiousbacteria. Incineration, burial, and rendering, under the conditions explainedabove, are the only viable options for carcass disposal that would notpresent disease risk. For that reason, we find it necessary to limit carcassdisposal to these options.Suggested Physical Plant Requirements  Commenters made several other suggestions to enhance the security and operationof a quarantine facility, such as a visual and electrical method to monitorand control entry doors, bonded security guards, fencing, and instrumentsto gauge the ammonia level in the facility. No changes are made based onthese comments. While we do not dispute that certain additions could marginallyenhance the security and operation of a facility, we have determined thatcompliance with the standards contained in this final rule will be adequateto ensure that sheep in the facility do not present a risk of spreadingcommunicable livestock diseases.Operating Procedures: andSection; 92.45(b)(3)<ITAG tagnum="81">_Showering Requirements  </ITAG>Several commenters objected to the proposed requirements that personnelshower when entering and leaving the sheep-holding area, and when leavingthe necropsy area after conducting a necropsy. One commenter suggestedthat it should not be necessary to shower after conducting a necropsy unlessthe person is actually leaving the facility. No changes are made basedon these comments. As suggested by one commenter, one reason for the requirementfor showering upon entry is as an additional precaution against possibledisease transfer from domestic livestock. We reaffirm the rationale statedin the proposal at 53 FR 6658 which indicated that the operating requirementsare necessary to preclude transmission of any animal disease agent intothe facility, from the facility, and from one lot of sheep to another withinthe facility. Further, the possibility of exposure to disease is greaterin conducting a necropsy than with other sheep-handling activities. Tohelp ensure that the person who conducted the necropsy would not presentany risk of transferring any disease organisms to sheep in the facility,we find it necessary to require showering upon leaving the necropsy areaafter conducting a necropsy even if the person is not actually leavingthe facility.<ITAG tagnum="81">_Contact with Other Lots of Sheep  </ITAG>We also proposed to prohibit any person entering the sheep-holding areafrom having contact with other lots of sheep within the facility and withruminants and swine outside the facility for a period of time determinedby the supervising veterinarian as necessary to prevent a risk of spreadingcommunicable livestock diseases. One commenter indicated that the specificperiod of time should be stated and have the force of law to help preventdisease from escaping from a quarantine facility. No changes are made basedon this comment. This period of time would vary, depending on the healthstatus of the sheep at the time the person was in the sheep-holding area.The supervisory veterinarian will be familiar with the health status ofthe sheep and will be able to determine the specific period of time ona case by case basis.<ITAG tagnum="81">_Maintenance of Daily Log  </ITAG>As a part of the operating procedures, we proposed to make the operatorof the quarantine facility responsible for maintaining a current dailylog for each lot of sheep. Commenters suggested that maintaining the logshould be the responsibility of the Veterinary Services veterinarian supervisingthe facility. We agree that the supervisory veterinarian could more appropriatelyassume responsibility for this log since that person will be supervisingthe activities that will be recorded in the log. The final rule includesthis change. The operator of the facility will remain responsible for keepingthe log for twelve months following the release of the sheep from quarantineand making it available to Veterinary Services personnel upon request.Environmental Requirements: andSection; 92.45(b)(4)  Several commenters contended that the responsibility for certifying compliancewith all applicable laws for environmental protection should rest withthe APHIS Administrator, not with an unspecified government official. Nochanges are made based on this comment. The responsibility for making judgmentsto determine compliance with the environmental protection laws associatedwith the operation of a quarantine facility is not within the APHIS Administrator'sauthority. That authority rests with other federal, state, and local officials.<ITAG tagnum="84">Health Certification Requirements for Sheep from New Zealand</ITAG>Types of Sheep Covered by the Health Certificate One commenter apparently assumed that the health certification requirementswere only for sheep that would be consigned from the port of entry directlyto a slaughtering establishment. This is incorrect. The health certificationrequirements for sheep from New Zealand do not include provisions to allowconsignment of the animals from the port of entry directly to a slaughteringestablishment. Other commenters argued that lambs for slaughter should be the only sheepallowed to be imported into the United States from New Zealand. They asserted,generally, that if these sheep were consigned directly to slaughter, theywould not mix with the domestic flock, and would present less of a diseaserisk. No changes are made based on this comment. APHIS imposes restrictionson the importation of animals into the United States only insofar as necessaryto prevent the introduction of communicable animal diseases. There is noveterinary medical basis for limiting the sheep imported from New Zealandto lambs for slaughter. We are confident that any sheep from New Zealandbrought into the United States under the regulations would not presenta risk of introducing communicable animal diseases.Responsibility for Issuing Health Certificates Our proposal provided that the health certification could be made by anyveterinarian authorized by the Government of New Zealand to do so. Theproposal provided further that if the veterinarian issuing the certificatewas not a salaried veterinarian of the national veterinary services ofNew Zealand, the certificate would have to be endorsed by a salaried veterinarianof New Zealand's national veterinary services. Several commenters suggestedthat the health certification should be the responsibility of APHIS officials.In our opinion, the suggested requirement is not warranted in order toensure the validity of the health certification. For animals imported intothe United States from countries free of foot-and-mouth disease and rinderpest,we depend on officials of the national veterinary services of the exportingcountries for export health certifications. Our veterinary services officialsfurnish similar export health certifications for animals exported fromthe United States.Scrapie Proposed paragraph (a)(1) of the health certification requirements includeda requirement to certify New Zealand's freedom from scrapie. Also, underproposed paragraph (a)(4), the health certificate must contain a statementthat the sheep is not the first generation progeny of a sire or dam thathas been affected with scrapie. Several commenters suggested that the requirementin proposed paragraph (a)(4) would be unnecessary, considering that NewZealand has never had an outbreak of scrapie and that it imposes stringentimport requirements for sheep. We had included this requirement in theproposal as a precautionary measure to minimize the risk of any offspringoffered for importation into the United States being affected with scrapie.However, upon further consideration of the facts mentioned by the commenters,plus our judgment that New Zealand has a surveillance system adequate todetect scrapie in the unlikely event that it should occur there, we concurwith the commenters. We have deleted this provision from the final rule.Spayed Females Under the proposed health certification requirements, all spayed femaleswould be exempt from the brucellosis testing requirements and spayed femalesintended for slaughter would be exempt from the tuberculosis testing requirements.In order for spayed females to qualify for these exemptions, we proposedto require certification that the spaying operation was conducted underthe direct supervision of a salaried veterinarian of the national veterinaryservices of New Zealand. One commenter suggested that other veterinarians specially authorized bythe New Zealand veterinary services should be allowed to supervise andcertify the operation. Other commenters maintained that the option of spayingfemales should not be allowed, based on their assertions of a probabilityof error and abuse and a subsequent disease risk. Still other commentersobjected, asserting that the procedure is not normally done in New Zealandand that the cost would be prohibitive. We are confident that, if the operation is conducted under the direct supervisionof a salaried veterinarian of the national veterinary services of New Zealand,properly certified female sheep would not present a risk of introducingtuberculosis or brucellosis into the United States. Limiting supervisionto these persons is necessary to help ensure compliance. We recognize thatspaying females may not be a viable option for most people exporting sheepfrom New Zealand to the United States. However, the fact that many peoplemay not find the option workable should not preclude us from leaving itas an alternative for those who may choose to use it. Therefore, the provisionremains as proposed.Inspection of the Sheep Another proposed health certification requirement was for the sheep tobe inspected by the certifying veterinarian and found free of evidenceof communicable disease within seven days prior to movement to the isolationarea. Several commenters asked that ``communicable disease'' be defined or thatwe furnish a list of communicable diseases. We are using the term ``communicabledisease'' as already defined in andSection;92.1: ``[a]ny contagious, infectious,or communicable disease of domestic livestock, poultry or other animals.''Some commenters maintained that inspection by the certifying veterinarianof a large number of sheep within a  7-day period would be a physical impossibility.We did not intend to require that a single veterinarian inspect an inordinatenumber of sheep within a limited period. For large shipments, several veterinarianswill be needed to assume this responsibility. Each veterinarian will certifythose sheep that he or she has inspected.Also, commenters requested clarification as to whether the isolation areacould be a separate area on the farm or the pre-export feedlot assemblypoint. Under the final rule, either of these places could be an isolationarea if it meets the requirements of the regulations. An isolation areais an area in which sheep intended for export are held and have no physicalcontact with other sheep except sheep scheduled for the same shipment.Premises Free from DiseaseAs a precautionary measure, we also proposed provisions requiring a determinationof freedom from certain diseases on any premises on which the sheep hadbeen at any time during 12-month period to moving to the isolation area.A 12-month period of freedom from tuberculosis, bluetongue, and brucellosiswas specified; a 6-month period was specified for freedom from other diseasesof livestock.One commenter questioned whether the reference to brucellosis meant onlybrucellosis variety ovis. That is what was intended since it is the varietyof brucellosis to which sheep from New Zealand would most likely have beenexposed. We have specified brucellosis variety ovis in the final rule.Other commenters suggested that bluetongue be removed from the provsion,since that disease is not known to exist in New Zealand. Upon further consideration,we have determined that this requirement can be deleted without any increaseddisease risk. We believe that the testing and survey requirements for bluetonguein New Zealand will be adequate to ensure that sheep imported in compliancewith these requirments would not present a risk of having the disease.Another commenter questioned the rationale for the provision. He assertedthat the time periods for freedom from the diseases are not technicallyjustifiable. No further changes are made based on this comment. It is notpossible to specify a definite minimum time after which certain diseasescould be guaranteed not to recur in a herd of sheep. We acknowledge thatarguments could be made for greater or lesser time periods. A longer timewas specified for freedom from tuberculosis and brucellosis in part becausewe have control and eradication programs for these diseases and, for thatreason, want to take additional precautions to ensure that no sheep areconvalescent carriers of these diseases.Individual IdentificationThe proposed health certification requirements included a requirement forindividual identification of the sheep using an eartag or bangle tag approvedby the Administrator as being tamper-resistant. We further proposed torequire that the eartag or bangle tag conform to an alpha-numeric systemwhich uses the letters ``NZ'' followed by no more than 6 numbers and thatit provide unique identification for each sheep.Some commenters contended that the proposed individual identification requirementwould be too stringent a requirement for feeder lambs. Their suggestionsincluded: (1) A system of number ranges assigned to specific propertiesor origin to allow individual identification back to the farm of origin;(2) use of an ear mark system used by New Zealand sheep farms; or (3) aprovision that each sheep must be identifiable to its farm of origin, withoutspecifying the method. Other commenters argued that the proposed requirementwas too lax. Some suggested requirements that an eartag be placed in eachear, not just one ear. Others suggested requiring a tattoo in additionto an eartag, and records tracking the exact location of the sheep aftertheir release from quarantine.No changes are made based on these comments. In order to ensure the validityof the certification for each sheep, to ensure that the sheep presentedat the port of entry is in fact the animal referred to in the accompanyingdocuments, and to avoid mistakes in recording laboratory results or possiblediagnosis of disease, it is necessary to establish and maintain a singlemeans of identifying sheep for the entire importation process. In our judgment,the requirements in the final rule are the minimum requirements that wouldbe adequate to provide identification of individual sheep. The first threesuggestions would not provide for identification of individual sheep. Whilewe do not dispute that the other suggestions could decrease the possibilityof error in tracing back sheep, we think the requirements in the finalrule are sufficient.Movement to the Isolation AreaOne commenter objected to the proposed requirement that an official designatedby the national veterinary services of New Zealand supervise the cleaningand disinfection of the means of conveyance in which sheep are moved tothe isolation area. He indicated that the certification would be costlyand difficult to achieve administratively because sheep for export willbe obtained from a wide geographical area. The commenter suggested thata statement by the driver of the vehicle or certification by the truckingfirm should suffice. No changes are made based on this comment. In ourjudgment limiting supervision to officials designated by the New Zealandgovernment is warranted in order to help ensure compliance.Isolation PeriodSeveral commenters questioned the validity of the requirement for keepingthe sheep in an isolation area for a period of at least 60 days immediatelyprior to export. They suggested, generally, that the period is not defensiblefrom a biological standpoint. Also, they asserted that this requirementpresents practical problems for the handling of animals intended for slaughterbecause, with a 60-day isolation period, they are likely to reach marketingweight prior to their release from quarantine in the United States. Anothercommenter pointed out the possibility of other countries imposing a similarrequirement on livestock exported from the United States as his reasonfor objecting to the proposed requirement.As indicated in the proposal at 53 FR 6661, a 60-day isolation period wasproposed as a reasonable time for conducting all of the prescribed testsand treatments, and an adequate time within which a disease that a sheepmight be harboring would manifest itself. With the changes in the proposedtesting requirements, which are discussed below, in addition to the otherrequirements of the final rule, we have determined that 30 days will bean adequate isolation period for these purposes if all the applicable requirementsare met within that period. If retesting for tuberculosis should be necessary,the period would be extended as explained below. Also, certification thata sheep has been free from evidence of communicable diseases and exposureto communicable diseases during the 60-day period immediatley prior toexport is still required. As noted in the proposal, the importation ofsheep which have been exposed to any disease within 60 days period to theirexportation is prohibited by 21 U.S.C. 104.Handling on an ``All-in, All-out Basis''We also proposed to require that all sheep entering the isolation areabe handled on an ``all-in, all-out'' basis. Commenters requested that wereconsider this requirement. They explained that in setting up shipmentsit is customary to assemble 10-20% more animals than are ordered by theoverseas buyer to allow for sorting and rejection for health status andfor other reasons. It was suggested that the exporter should have the optionof holding animals rejected for non-health reasons for subsequent shipments.The requirement as written would not preclude holding animals rejectedfor non-health reasons for a later shipment. However, if these sheep areto be grouped with new sheep entering the isolation area for treatmentand testing, then they would have to qualify for health certification asa part of the later group. The 30-day countdown for the isolation periodwould not begin until all sheep designated for qualification during thatisolation period have entered the isolation area.Tuberculosis TestingOne commenter questioned why a tuberculosis test is proposed for sheepfrom New Zealand, except for wethers and spayed females intended for slaughter,when the same test is not required for the importation into the UnitedStates of sheep from some other countries in which tuberculosis is knownto exist. Determination of whether to require testing for a disease foranimals imported into the United States is based on factors such as thenature of the disease and how it is spread, the prevalence of the diseasein the country of origin, and the effectiveness of any eradication or controlprograms in the country of origin. Tuberculosis is prevalent in the opossumpopulation in New Zealand. Transfer of the disease to other ruminants,such as sheep, is not uncommon. Efforts on the part of New Zealand havenot yet been fully successful in eradicating tuberculosis from their livestockpopulation. It is our veterinary medical judgment that the test and certificationof freedom from the disease is necessary to ensure that these sheep wouldnot present a risk of spreading the disease.We proposed that all sheep in the isolation area, except both wethers andspayed females intended for slaughter, be tested for tuberculosis within60 days prior to export, with removal of any sheep that tested positive,and retesting of the remainder of the sheep in the isolation area afterno less than 60 days. We reconsidered the timing of this testing as a partof examining the comments on the length of the isolation period. We havedetermined that the same intended effect, that is, certification of thesheep's freedom from tuberculosis, can be achieved by requiring the testfor tuberculosis within 30 days prior to export. If any animals testedpositive, the retest of the remainder of the sheep in the isolation areawould still be required after a period of 60 days. This 60-day intervalbetween tests is necessary to ensure the accuracy of the second test.Brucellosis TestingWe proposed to require the standard direct complement fixation test forbrucellosis for all sheep in the isolation area, except wethers and spayedfemales.One commenter asserted that the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay (ELISA)test is a more accurate test and suggested that it be required for brucellosistesting instead of the standard direct complement fixation test. We arecurrently evaluating the ELISA procedures. Upon completion of the evaluationwe will propose whatever changes, if any, appear warranted in the brucellosistesting requirements.Commenters also made several disparate suggestions on brucellosis testing.It was suggested that APHIS: (1) Test all sheep, based on the assertionthat spayed females can transmit the disease; (2) test only breeding rams,based on the assertion that the disease is a disease of entire males only;and (3) in lieu of testing, allow certification that the flock of originis free of brucellosis. Based on scientific data, we disagree with theassertions in suggestions 1 and 2. Brucellosis is an infection that manifestsitself in the uro-genital tract. Only sexually intact animals are capableof spreading the disease. Although brucellosis is much more common amongbreeding rams, it has also been found in ewes and usually results in abortions.The regulations require testing only for sexually intact animals. Theseanimals will probably be added to United States breeding flocks. The brucellosistesting is necessary to help eliminate the risk of any further spread ofthe disease among United States flocks.Certification of Freedom from AkabaneWe proposed testing all sheep in the isolation area for Akabane using thevirus neutralization test.<ITAG tagnum="81">_Additional Means of Certification</ITAG>Some commenters contended that testing should not be required for Akabane,based on assertions that the disease is not known to exist in New Zealand;the only proven vector of the disease, a midge<T3> (Culicoides brevitarsis),</T3> does not exist in New Zealand; andstatements that recent surveys of the cattle, sheep, and goat populationsof New Zealand have proven negative for the disease. Some commenters contendedthat a statement that New Zealand is free of the disease would be sufficientcertification. Other commenters suggested that, instead of testing, weshould allow certification of flocks as being free of Akabane and othervector-borne diseases. Some of these commenters specifically suggestedcertification based on serological surveys of flocks of origin that coulddetect a 5 percent infection rate at a 95 percent confidence level.Although Akabane may not be known to exist in New Zealand, it is our understandingthat sheep, cattle and goats have been imported into New Zealand from acountry in which Akabane is known to exist under conditions that wouldnot be adequate to qualify them for entry into the United States and, inour judgment, may not have been adequate to preclude the introduction ofthat disease into New Zealand. Further,<T3> Culicoides brevitarsis</T3> is not the only proven vector of Akabane.According to the scientific literature, the mosquito is also a vector andit is known to exist in New Zealand. We accept that surveys of the ruminantpopulations of New Zealand have proven negative for Akabane. However, wequestion whether the number of animals sampled to date would be an adequatebasis for removing all Akabane requirements from the regulations.While not concurring fully with some of the commenters' statements, wehave concluded, based in part on comments and a review of documentationfrom the New Zealand government, that the certification requirement discussedbelow would be adequate to ensure that sheep imported into the United Statesfrom New Zealand would not present a risk of introducing Akabane.We are adding an option that may be used instead of certification basedon tests for all sheep to be exported to the United States, namely, certificationthat sheep are from flocks determined to be free of Akabane. The determinationthat a flock of origin of sheep is free of Akabane must be based on negativeresults from a biometrically designed serological survey of the flock designedto detect a one percent infection rate at a 99 percent confidence level.Further, each survey must have been conducted within four months priorto movement of the sheep to the isolation area and must have been conductedby officials designated by the national veterinary services of New Zealand.The test administered must be the same as that required for testing duringthe isolation period.To facilitate understanding of these requirements, we are adding definitionsof ``flock'' and ``flock of origin.'' A ``flock'' means all sheep undercommon ownership or supervision that are grouped on one or more parts ofany single premises; or all sheep under common ownership or supervisionon two or more premises which are geographically separated but on whichanimals from the different premises have been interchanged or had contactwith animals from the other premises, or with their excrement or discharges.Also, a ``flock of origin'' means the flock of which the sheep have beena part for the 4 months immediately prior to movement to the isolationarea or for their entire lives, whichever period of time is less.Wethers and Spayed FemalesOne commenter suggested that wethers and spayed females should be exemptfrom any testing requirement for Akabane, based on the assertion that thereal significance of Akabane is with breeding sheep, not with feeder lambs.We disagree. Akabane is a vector-borne disease. Whether or not an animalis sexually intact is not relevant to transmission of vector-borne diseases.To be eligible for importation into the United States, wethers and spayedfemales will have to be certified free of Akabane as a result of testingduring the isolation period or as a result of a serological survey of theflock of origin, as explained above.<ITAG tagnum="81">_Is One Virus Neutralization Test Adequate for Detecting Akabane?</ITAG>Other commenters found the proposed testing requirements for Akabane inadequate.One maintained that one virus neutralization test is entirely inadequate;another suggested that the entire lot of sheep should be rejected if onesheep tests positive. No changes are made based on these comments. Theregulations provide that, if any sheep test positive, they must be removedfrom the isolation area, and after no less than 30 days, the remainderof the sheep in the isolation must be retested and found negative to thetest. The virus neutralization test is recognized world-wide throughoutthe veterinary medical community as a standard means of diagnosing Akabane.It is impossible to achieve one hundred percent assurance of protectionagainst the introduction into the United States of any exotic disease.However, as explained above in this section, ``Certification of Freedomfrom Akabane,'' we believe the testing and survey requirements containedin the final rule are adequate to ensure protection against the introductionof Akabane into the United States.Bluetongue and Epizootic Hemorrhagic Disease TestingWe proposed testing for bluetongue and epizootic hemorrhagic disease forall sheep in the isolation area only if any sheep in the isolation areahad had an opportunity for exposure to either of these diseases within12 months prior to entering the isolation area. The proposed regulationindicated that opportunity for exposure would exist if during that 12-monthperiod, a sheep had been on a premises that, at any time during the timethe sheep was on that premises or at any time during the 2-year periodprior to the movement of the sheep to that premises, had contained sheepfrom a country not free of the disease. Several commenters objected toany certification requirements, based on their assertions that neitherthese diseases nor their vectors have been reported to exist in New Zealand.We do not fully accept the commenters' rationale for having no requirementwith respect to these diseases. Although bluetongue is not known to existin New Zealand, it is our understanding that sheep have been imported intoNew Zealand from a country in which bluetongue is known to exist underconditions that would not be adequate to qualify them for entry into theUnited States. Further, although vectors may not be reported to exist,according to the scientific literature, both bluetongue and epizootic hemorrhagicdisease may also be spread by infected semen. However, for the same reasonsas discussed above for Akabane, we have concluded that, for those sheepfor which individual testing was proposed, a certification requirementparallel to the Akabane requirement would be adequate to ensure freedomfrom these diseases.Therefore, we are adding an option for certification that sheep are fromflocks determined to be free of bluetongue and epizootic hemorrhagic disease.As with Akabane, the determinations that a flock of origin of sheep isfree of bluetongue and epizootic hemorrhagic disease must be based on negativeresults from biometrically designed serological surveys of the flock designedto detect a one percent infection rate at a 99 percent confidence level.Further, each survey must have been conducted within four months priorto movement of the sheep to the isolation area and must have been conductedby officials designated by the national veterinary services of New Zealand.The tests administered to the selected sampling of sheep and the interpretationof the test results must be the same as those required for testing duringthe isolation period.<ITAG tagnum="81">Other Suggestions Regarding Testing for Diseases and Parasites </ITAG>Commenters also mentioned the possibility of sheep from New Zealand havingdiseases or parasites other than those for which certification is required.Some maintained that this possibility warrants prohibiting the entry ofthe animals. Others argued that we should add other testing or treatmentrequirements. Their concerns focused on: internal parasites, such as liverflukes,sheep tapeworms, and nematodes; leptospirosis; malignant catarrhal fever;biotypes associated with the shipping fever complex, and a variety of arbovirusesother than those for which we require certification (Akabane, bluetongue,and epizootic hemorrhagic disease). We carefully considered each of thesesuggestions, and have concluded that no additional requirements are warrantedbased on these comments. It is not feasible to test or treat for everypossible disease or parasite that sheep could have. Generally, we do notdeem that the risk presented by sheep from New Zealand with respect tothese diseases and parasites warrants any additional specific requirementsat this time. There are ample requirements in the regulations for certifyingthe sheep, and the premises on which they have been for a period of time,free of communicable diseases and free from exposure to communicable diseases.There are also provisions allowing the Administrator to impose additionalrequirements for the sheep in quarantine in specific cases if needed todetermine their health status, prevent spread of disease among sheep inquarantine, and prevent escape of animal disease agents from the facility.If the disease status of sheep in New Zealand changed so that sheep fromthat country would present a significant risk of introducing any exoticcommunicable disease into the United States livestock population, we wouldamend our regulations to ensure that the disease would not enter the UnitedStates. Commenters suggested that we review and modify testing requirements asexperience with several importations may indicate. One commenter was specificallyreferring to the requirements for arboviruses. We reiterate that the testingrequirements contained in this final rule are those that have been determinedto be necessary at this time to ensure protection against the introductionof communicable livestock diseases. Whenever we become aware that any requirementsare no longer appropriate, we will initiate action to modify them as necessary.Ectoparasites The ectoparasite provisions in the proposed rule included a requirementfor treatment of all sheep for ticks by being dipped once in a 0.125 percent concentration of the pesticide coumaphos. We also proposed a specifiedlime sulfur dip treatment for psorergates mites. Commenters requested that we allow certification that the sheep are froman area that is free of ticks in lieu of the dipping requirement. No changesare made based on this comment. We neither dispute nor affirm that someareas in New Zealand are free of some varieties of ticks. However, we deemthe requirement for dipping the best way to ensure that the sheep are freefrom ectoparasites when shipped to the United States. Commenters contended further that the choice of the pesticide should bethe responsibility of the national veterinary services of New Zealand becausethose officials would be aware of better pesticides as they enter the marketand could stipulate which pesticide to use. No changes are made based onthis comment. We do depend on the national veterinary services of New Zealandto apply criteria and exercise discretion in determining whether healthcertification standards are met. However, it is an APHIS responsibilityto set standards, and we think it would be an abrogation of that responsibilityto delegate standard-setting, even for decisions such as which pesticidesare efficacious for destroying ectoparasites. Commenters also maintained that there are probably ``better and more modern''pesticides than those specified in the proposal. They asserted furtherthat the 0.125 concentration of coumaphos would be relatively high forthe treatment of lambs. We do not dispute that there are other pesticidesthat would serve the same purpose. However, the efficacy of both the limesulfur dip and coumaphos for these treatments is well-documented. In addition,they are both readily available and relatively inexpensive. Further, accordingto the manufacturer's instructions, the .125 concentration of coumaphosis the minimum concentration effective for dipping sheep for ticks. Ifwe are presented with documentation suggesting that another pesticide wouldbe preferable, we will evaluate the information and propose any changesthat might be indicated. The proposed ectoparasite provisions also included a requirement that thecertifying veterinarian inspect the sheep and find them free of ectoparasiteswithin 72 hours prior to their being loaded on the means of conveyancefor transport to the United States. Commenters pointed out that this wouldbe very difficult to achieve, due to the large numbers of sheep. We havedetermined that sheep that have been shorn within 60 days prior to thetreatment for ticks would not need to be inspected to determine their freedomfrom ectoparasites. Wool on a sheep interferes with the effectiveness ofthe ectoparasite treatment. Although it is generally recognized that treatmentsfor ectoparasites are not 100 percent effective, the sheep that have beenshorn as specified would be much less likely to have ectoparasites aftertheir treatment. In our judgment, these sheep could be safely importedinto the United States without further inspection for ectoparasites. Thosesheep that have not been shorn as specified would still need to be inspectedto ensure their freedom from ectoparasites. Health Certification: Shearing Other commenters suggested that the health certification provisions shouldinclude a requirement that the sheep be shorn within two weeks prior toexport. They asserted that shearing would prevent the wool from qualifyingfor incentive payments under the Wool Act of 1954 and would reduce healthrisks. The issue of determining whether wool qualifies for incentive paymentsis not within APHIS authority. Nor do we consider it necessary to requireshearing in order to reduce health risks. As explained above, sheep thathave been shorn as specified are exempted from the inspection requirementsin the ectoparasite provisions. Quarantine upon Arrival <ITAG tagnum="81">_Length of Quarantine </ITAG>The proposed regulations also included a requirement for quarantine ofthe sheep upon arrival in the United States for a period of not less than30 days. One commenter said that the quarantine period should be increasedto 45 days. He did not give the basis for his suggestion. Several othercommenters objected to the not-less-than-30-day requirement based, generally,on what they perceived as its inconsistency with the requirement in andSection;92.11 for a quarantine period of not less than 15 days for swine and ruminantsother than cattle imported from any part of the world except Canada. Someof these commenters suggested that the requirement specify not less than15 days. No changes are made based on these comments. Several commenters apparentlyread the not-less-than-15-day quarantine requirement as requiring onlya 15-day quarantine. It has been our experience that sheep imported intothe United States have been quarantined for at least 30 days in order toconfirm their freedom from communicable diseases. Quarantine upon arrivalis important because shipment causes stress for the sheep. Animals understress are more likely to manifest signs of disease. The ``not less than30 day'' requirement more accurately reflects the time needed for testingand confirmation of freedom from disease. <ITAG tagnum="81">_Testing During Quarantine </ITAG>The proposed provisions concerning quarantine upon arrival also providedfor testing of all sheep in quarantine for brucellosis variety ovis. Also,the proposed provisions provided that the Administrator might find it necessary,in order to determine that the animals are free from communicable disease,to require other tests duplicative of the pre-embarkation tests or additionaltests. The provision required that the sheep test negative to these testsalso.Several commenters requested clarification as to whether the tests duplicativeof the pre-embarkation tests are mandatory or discretionary. The only testthat is mandated during quarantine in the United States is the test forbrucellosis variety ovis. The other tests are discretionary, based uponthe Administrator's determination that they are necessary to determinethat the animals are indeed free from communicable diseases. Other commenters objected to the brucellosis testing requirements and reiteratedthe objections they voiced to the pre-embarkation testing requirements.No changes are made based on these comments. Considering the nature ofthe disease and the efforts that are being expended to eradicate brucellosisin this country, we confirm that the brucellosis testing requirements arenecessary to confirm that the sheep have remained negative to the disease.Some commenters maintained that we should also require retesting of thesheep for bluetongue and Akabane during their quarantine, based on theassertion that the animals could be exposed and contract the disease whileen route from New Zealand to the quarantine facility in the United States.We are not adding specific requirements for these tests. The animals willhave been certified and found free of the diseases prior to leaving NewZealand. These are vector-borne diseases. We think the probability of theanimals being infected en route is too remote to justify a specific requirementfor testing for these diseases during quarantine. The final rule containsprovisions allowing testing for these diseases, or any other disease, ifthe Administrator determines that the testing is necessary. Antibiotics Several commenters suggested that we add a prohibition against the useof antibiotics for the sheep during their quarantine. They asserted thatantibiotics could mask symptoms of any number of serious communicable diseases.No changes are made based on this comment. Apparently these commentersassumed that antibiotics would be given prior to any attempt to make adiagnosis. This is not the case. If a sheep shows signs of illness duringquarantine, the supervisory veterinarian will take action to make a diagnosisprior to allowing any treatment. After a diagnosis has been made, if itis determined that treatment with antibiotics would be beneficial, thesupervisory veterinarian would be exercising sound veterinary medical judgmentby allowing the treatment. Antibiotics affect bacteria, but do not affectviruses and therefore, would not mask viral infections, such as bluetongueor Akabane.Humane Standards Two organizations recommended that APHIS establish humane standards forthe sea transport of sheep, and include these standards in this rulemaking.These organizations also recommended establishment of a certification programto ensure enforcement of the suggested standards. They further requestedthat our regulation authorize at least one competent observer from an animalprotection organization to be present at any given time during the unloadingof the ship and transport of the animals to the quarantine facility tomonitor the handling and physical condition of the arriving animals. No changes are made based on these comments. Although APHIS is concernedabout the humane treatment of sheep while in transit to the United States,the establishment of regulations concerning this aspect of the import operationis not within our statutory mandate.Executive Order 12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act<ITAG tagnum="81">_Response to Comments </ITAG>A number of commenters noted their concurrence with the Executive Order12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act Statement in the proposed rule andaffirmed or elaborated on points contained in that statement. Several othercommenters indicated that they disagreed with our analysis, but they didnot submit any data to support their assertions. Some commenters disagreed with our estimate that approximately 162,000sheep that might not otherwise be imported into the United States willbe imported annually under this final rule. Our estimate was based on thequota set by New Zealand for sheep allowed to be exported from New Zealandto the United States annually. Commenters submitted projections of effectson the economy based on an estimate of 270,000 to 360,000 sheep. Thesecommenters indicated that their estimated range was that of the only importerwho has requested a permit to import large numbers of sheep. However, accordingto that importer's statement at the public hearing in Portland, Oregon,his program calls for the annual import of approximately 160,000 lambsfrom New Zealand through the port of Portland. Considering the logisticsof any importation, we deem this an outside estimate for that importer.We realize that other people may also import sheep into the United Statesthrough privately operated quarantine facilities. However, to date no onehas indicated any interest in doing that. Although we readily acknowledge that any estimate is imperfect, with theinformation available to us at this time, it remains our best estimatethat approximately 162,000 sheep that might not otherwise be imported intothe United States will be imported annually under this final rule. If sheepimportations should become 324,000 head annually, as suggested by the commenters,then the amount of lamb available in the United States would increase 6percent with a 2.4 percent estimated decrease in price (1.8 cents per pound),based on a lamb price of $0.75 per pound. This is much less than the currentyear-to-year fluctuation in United States lamb production and price.Commenters differed as to whether a uniform supply of lamb is currentlyavailable. Some contended that sheep imported under this final rule wouldprovide a constant supply of fresh lamb in the markets, thereby creatingmore lamb consumption, improving demand for lamb products and resultingin consistent prices for domestic growers as well as importers. Othersmaintained that current production does not leave seasonal gaps, and thatUnited States lamb producers are in the process of increasing productionsufficiently to meet any foreseeable demand in domestic markets. Accordingto United States Department of Agriculture reports, the percent of theannual lamb slaughter that is processed each quarter of a year shows fluctuationsfrom 23.4 percent to 27.1 percent for the 4-year period from 1984 through1987. Additional regular supplies of lamb, whether from domestic productionor regular importations, would have little, if any, effect on seasonalvariations. Further, as indicated above, the impact on lamb prices of a6 percent increase in the amount of lamb available in the United States(the largest projection suggested by commenters), would be much less thanthe current year-to-year fluctuation.Several commenters who indicated that they raise sheep asserted that theyoppose allowing the importation of sheep through privately operated quarantinefacilities because they do not want any additional economic competition.This is not a valid reason to preclude the entry of these animals. Theregulations in 9 CFR Part 92 are established pursuant to animal quarantineand related laws which generally provide authority to take action to preventthe introduction or dissemination of certain diseases. These statutoryprovisions do not provide authority for establishing prohibitions basedmerely on factors relating to economic competition. In addition, althoughthe Department considers economic issues in accordance with Executive Order12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act, these economic issues must beconsidered within the framework of animal quarantine and related laws.Some commenters cautioned the agency to avoid putting constraints on theimportation of sheep to protect local markets, thereby erecting a non-tarifftrade barrier and inviting reciprocal action by other countries. No changesare made based on this comment. The requirements contained in the finalrule are those requirements that have been determined to be necessary toprotect against the introduction into the United States of communicableanimal diseases.Executive Order 12291 and Regulatory Flexibility Act StatementWe are issuing this rule in conformance with Executive Order 12291, andwe have determined that it is not a ``major rule.'' Based on informationcompiled by the Department, we have determined that this rule will havean effect on the economy of less than $100 million; will not cause a majorincrease in costs or prices for consumers, individual industries, federal,state, or local government agencies, or geographic regions; and will notcause a significant adverse effect on competition, employment, investment,productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-based enterprisesto compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or export markets.Before the effective date of this rule, the expected domestic lamb slaughterfor calendar year 1988 was approximately 620,100,000 pounds, live weight.With the adoption of this rule, we anticipate that approximately 162,000sheep that might not otherwise be imported into the United States may beimported annually. It is expected that all of these animals will be slaughteredwithin two to three months after importation. This will add approximatelythree percent to the amount of lamb available for marketing in the UnitedStates, and could decrease slightly, probably no more than one cent perpound, the price paid to the producer for lamb. According to the 1982 Censusof Agriculture, there are 99,396 farms producing lambs, sheep, and wool.Using sales per farm of under $100,000 from lambs, sheep, and wool as thedefinition of a small sheep business, there are 88,237 such businessesin the United States, according to the 1982 Census of Agriculture. Of these49,052 farms had sales of lambs, sheep, and wool valued at less than $10,000per year. It should be noted that raising sheep for slaughter is not thesole source of business income for most United States sheep producers.We anticipate that the importation of sheep through privately operatedquarantine facilities will have a negligible effect on the wool supplyin the United States. This is because the sheep will have been shorn shortlybefore entering the United States. The importation will generate additionalactivity for a few other businesses: the importers, the feedlot operatorsthat feed the lambs, the feed mills that supply the feed, the meat packingplants that slaughter the lambs, and the wholesale and retail distributorsof the finished product.Under these circumstances, the Administrator of the Animal and Plant HealthInspection Service has determined that this action will not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities.MiscellaneousWe have also made nonsubstantive changes to avoid ambiguity and presentthe provisions of this rule more clearly.Paperwork Reduction ActInformation collection requirements contained in this document have beenapproved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under the provisionsof the Paperwork Reduction act of 1980 (44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq</T3>.) and have been assigned OMB control number 0579-0040.Executive Order 12372This program/activity is listed in the Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistanceunder No. 10.025 and is subject to the provisions of Executive Order 12372,which requires intergovernmental consultation with state and local officials.(See 7 CFR 3015, Subpart V).<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 9 CFR Part 92</ITAG>Animal diseases, Canada, Imports, Livestock and livestock products, Mexico,Poultry and poultry products, Quarantine, Transportation, Wildlife.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 92_IMPORTATION OF CERTAIN ANIMALS AND POULTRY AND CERTAIN ANIMALAND POULTRY PRODUCTS; INSPECTION AND OTHER REQUIREMENTS FOR CERTAIN MEANSOF CONVEYANCE AND SHIPPING CONTAINERS THEREON</ITAG>Accordingly, 9 CFR Part 92 is amended as follows:1. The authority citation for Part 92 continues to read as set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority</T4>: 7 U.S.C. 1622; 19 U.S.C. 1306; 21 U.S.C. 102-105, 111,134a, 134b, 134c, 134d, 134f, and 135; 31 U.S.C. 9701; 7 CFR 2.17, 2.51,and 371.2(d).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. Section 92.1 is amended by adding, in alphabetical order, the following:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.1 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Administrator.</T3> The Administrator of the Animal and Plant HealthInspection Service or any other employee of the Animal and Plant HealthInspection Service, United States Department of Agriculture, to whom authorityhas been or may be delegated to act in the Administrator's stead.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>3. In andSection; 92.3, a new paragraph (j) is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.3 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Ports designated for the importation of animals and birds.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) <T3>Ports and privately operated quarantine facilities for sheep.</T3>Sheep may be entered into the United States at any port specified in paragraph(a) of this section, or at any other port designated as an internationalport or airport by the U.S. Customs Service and quarantined at privatelyoperated quarantine facilities provided the applicable provisions of andSection;andSection;92.2, 92.4(a), 92.7, 92.8, 92.44, and 92.45 are met.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>4. In paragraph (a)(1) of andSection; 92.5, ``and 92.40'' is changed to ``92.40,and 92.44.''5. In paragraph (a)(2) of andSection; 92.5, ``and 92.36,'' is changed to``92.36, and 92.44,''<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>6. In the first sentence of paragraph (b)(1) of andSection; 92.11, ``otherthan sheep from New Zealand and'' is inserted after ``Swine and ruminants''.7. In paragraph (b)(2) of andSection; 92.11, the following sentence is addedat the end of the paragraph:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.11 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Quarantine requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) * * *(2) * * * Sheep imported from New Zealand shall be subject to andSection;92.44 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>8. In andSection; 92.12, the heading for the section and the heading forparagraph (a) are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.12 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Animal quarantine facilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Privately operated quarantine facilities.</T3>9. In andSection; 92.12, paragraph (a) is amended by removing the words ``non-Governmentalquarantine facility'' and adding ``privately operated quarantine facility''in their place.10. In the second, fourth, sixth, eighth, and eleventh sentences of paragraph(a) of andSection; 92.12, the words ``Deputy Administrator, Veterinary Services,''are removed and ``Administrator'' is added in their place.11. In andSection; 92.12, the heading for paragraph (b) is amended to read:(b) <T3>Quarantine facilities maintained by Veterinary Services.</T3>12. In andSection; 92.12, the third sentence in paragraph (b) is amendedby replacing ``Veterinarian Services'' with ``Veterinary Services''.13. New andSection;andSection; 92.44 and 92.45 are added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.44 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Sheep from New Zealand.</ITAG>No sheep from New Zealand shall be imported or entered into the UnitedStates unless in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section.(a) <T3>Health certification requirements.</T3> No sheep shall be importedinto the United States from New Zealand unless accompanied by a healthcertificate. The certificate shall be either signed by a salaried veterinarianof the national veterinary services of New Zealand or signed by a veterinarianauthorized by the national veterinary services of New Zealand and endorsedby a salaried veterinarian of the national veterinary services of New Zealand(the endorsement represents that the veterinarian signing the certificatewas authorized to do so). The certificate shall certify that:(1) New Zealand is free from rinderpest, foot-and-mouth disease, contagiouspleuropneumonia, surra, and scrapie.(2) The sheep was born in New Zealand and has never been in any countryother than New Zealand.(3) The sheep is not the first generation progency of a sire or dam importedinto New Zealand from a country specified in andSection; 94.1 of this chapteras having rinderpest or foot-and-mouth disease.(4) If the sheep is a spayed female, the spaying operation was conductedunder the direct supervision of a salaried veterinarian of the nationalveterinary services of New Zealand (for the purposes of this section, ``direct''supervision means that the supervising person must be physically presentduring the operation).(5) The sheep was inspected by the certifying veterinarian and found freeof evidence of communicable disease within seven days prior to movementto an isolation area (for the purposes of this section an ``isolation area''shall mean an area in which sheep intended for export are held and haveno physical contact with other sheep except sheep scheduled for the sameshipment).(6) Any premises on which the sheep had been at any time during the 12-monthperiod prior to moving to the isolation area, had been free of any evidenceof tuberculosis and brucellosis variety ovis for the 12-month period immediatelypreceding the date of movement of the sheep from that premises, and hadbeen free of outbreaks of any other communicable disease of livestock forthe 6-month period immediately preceding the date of movement of the sheepfrom the premises. This certification shall be made insofar as can be determinedby the certifying veterinarian, based on information available from theowners of the premises, the owners of the sheep, and other sources.(7) Prior to moving the sheep to the isolation area, each sheep was individuallyidentified using an identification eartag or bangle tag meeting the followingspecifications:(i) The eartag or bangle tag is approved by the Administrator as beingtamper-resistant; and(ii) The eartag or bangle tag conforms to an alpha-numeric system whichuses the letters ``NZ'' followed by no more than 6 numbers and providesunique identification for each sheep.(8) If moved to the isolation area from another premises, (i) the sheepwas moved in a means of conveyance which, immediately prior to loadingthe animal, was cleaned and disinfected with a disinfectant specified inandSection; 71.10 of this chapter under the direct supervision of an officialdesignated by the national veterinary services of New Zealand; and(ii) The sheep had no physical contact with other animals (except sheepscheduled for the same shipment) during transit to the isolation area.(9) The sheep was kept in the isolation area for a period of at lest 30days immediately prior to export, under the supervision of a full-timesalaried veterinarian of the national veterinary services of New Zealand.The 30 day period began when all sheep designated for qualification duringa single isolation period had entered the isolation area.(10) All sheep which entered the isolation area were handled on an ``all-in,all-out'' basis, except for sheep removed in accordance with this section.(11) <T3>Tuberculosis testing.</T3> All sheep in the isolation area, exceptwethers and spayed females intended for slaughter, were subjected to anintradermal tuberculin test utilizing mammilian Purified Protein Derivative(PPD) tuberculin and tested negative within 30 days prior to export. Ifany sheep tested positive, they were removed from the isolation area, slaughtered,examined, and found to have no tubercular lesions, and after no less than60 days, the remainder of the sheep in the isolation area were retestedand found negative to such test. Negative test results mean that the supervisoryveterinarian detected no response using both visual examination and manualpalpation techniques at the site of the injection 72 hours after the injection.(12) <T3>Brucellosis testing.</T3> All sheep in the isolation area, except wethersand spayed females, were subjected to the standard direct complement-fixationtest for brucellosis variety ovis and tested negative within 30 days priorto export. Negative test results mean less than fifty percent fixation(2 plus) in a serum dilution of 1:10. If any sheep tested positive, theywere removed form the isolation area, and after no less than 30 days, theremainder of the sheep in the isolation area were retested and found negativeto the test.\1\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ The importation of sheep which have been exposed to anydisease within 60 days prior to their exportation is prohibited by 21 U.S.C.104.(13) <T3>Certification of freedom from Akabane, bluetongue, and epizootic hemorrhagicdisease.</T3>(i) <T3>Akabane.</T3> All sheep in the isolation area either were from flocksof origin determined to be free of Akabane as provided in paragraph (a)(13)(iv)of this section or were tested for Akabane as provided in this paragraph.If the determination of freedom from Akabane was made by testing, all sheepin the isolation area tested negative to the virus neutralization testfor Akabane at a serum dilution of 1:4 within 30 days prior to export.If any sheep tested positive, they were removed from the isolation area,and after no less than 30 days, the remainder of the sheep in the isolationarea were retested and found negative to the test.\1\(ii)<T3> Bluetongue.</T3> All sheep in the isolation area were required tobe certified as free from bluetongue only if, during the 12-month periodprior to movement to the isolation area, any sheep in the isolation areahad been on a premises that, at any time during the time the sheep wason that premises or at any time during the 2-year period prior to the movementof such sheep to that premises, had contained sheep from a country notfree of bluetongue. Certification, if required, was made either by determiningthat all sheep in the isolation area were from flocks of origin determinedto be free of bluetongue as provided in paragraph (a)(13)(iv) of this sectionor by testing all sheep in the isolation area for bluetongue as providedin this paragraph. If the determination of freedom from bluetongue wasmade by testing all sheep in the isolation area, all sheep tested negativeto the agar gel immunodiffusion (AGID) test for bluetongue within 30 daysprior to export. If any sheep tested positive, they were removed from theisolation area and after no less than 30 days, the remainder of the sheepin the isolation area were retested and found negative to the test.\1\(iii) <T3>Epizootic hemorrhagic disease.</T3> All sheep in the isolation areawere required to be certified as free from epizootic hemorrhagic diseaseonly if, during the 12-month period prior to movement to the isolationarea, any sheep in the isolation area had been on a premises that, at anytime during the time the sheep was on that premises or at any time duringthe 2-year period prior to the movement of such sheep to that premises,had contained sheep from a country not free of epizootic hemorrhagic disease.Certification, if required, was made either by determining that all sheepin the isolation area were from flocks of origin determined to be freeof epizootic hemorrhagic disease as provided in paragraph (a)(13)(iv) ofthis section or by testing all sheep in the isolation area for epizootichemorrhagic disease as provided in this paragraph. If the determinationof freedom from epizootic hemorrhagic disease was made by testing all sheepin the isolation area, all the sheep tested negative to the agar gel immunodifussion(AGID) test for epizootic hemorrhagic disease within 30 days prior to export.If any sheep tested positive, they were removed from the isolation areaand after no less than 30 days, the remainder of the sheep in the isolationarea were retested and found negative to the test.\1\(iv) <T3>Serological surveys of flocks of origin. </T3>The determination thata flock of origin of sheep is free of Akabane, bluetongue, or epizootichemorrhagic disease shall be based on negative results from a biometricallydesigned serological survey of the flock for the specific disease. Thesurvey must be designed to detect a one percent infection rate at a 99percent confidence level. Each survey must have been conducted within fourmonths prior to movement of the sheep to the isolation area and must havebeen conducted by officials designated by the national veterinary servicesof New Zealand. The tests administered to the sample of sheep and the interpretationof test results must be the same as those required for testing during theisolation period. (For the purposes of this section, a ``flock'' shallmean all sheep under common ownership or supervision that are grouped onone or more parts of any single premises; or all sheep under common ownershipor supervision on two or more premises which are geographically separatedbut on which animals from the different premises have been interchangedor had contact with animals from the other premises, or with their excrementor discharges. Also, for the purposes of this section, a ``flock of origin''shall mean the flock of which a sheep has been a part for the 4 monthsimmediately prior to movement to the isolation area or for its entire life,whichever period of time is less.)(14) <T3>Ectoparasites.</T3> (i) Within 10 days prior to export, all sheep weretreated for ticks by being dipped once in a 0.125 per cent concentrationof the pesticide coumaphos.(ii) Within 10 days prior to export, but at least 3 days after the treatmentreferred to in paragraph (a)(14)(i) of this section, all sheep were treatedonce for psorergates mites by being dipped in a 2 per cent lime sulfurdip. To ensure efficacy of the treatment, either a wetting agent shallbe added to the dip prior to dipping the sheep, or the dip shall be heatedto maintain a temperature of 95-105 degrees F. throughout the dipping process.(iii) The name of the pesticide, the concentration used to treat the sheep,and the dates of treatment.(iv) Any sheep not shorn within 60 days prior to the treatment for ticksreferred to in paragraph (a)(14)(i) of this section was inspected by theveterinarian signing the health certificate and was found free of any ectoparasiteswihin 72 hours prior to being loaded on the means of conveyance which transportedthe sheep to the United States.(15) The sheep has remained free from evidence of communicable diseasesand exposure to communicable diseases during the 60-day period immediatelyprior to export.(16) <T3>Movement from the isolation area to the port of embarkation. </T3>Thesheep was moved from the isolation area to the port of embarkation in ameans of conveyance which, immediately prior to loading the sheep, wascleaned and disinfected under the direct supervision of an official designatedby the national veterinary services of New Zealand with a disinfectantspecified in andSection; 71.10 of this chapter. Such movement was by themost expeditious route that would prevent possible exposure to diseasein transit. From the time of cleaning and disinfecting the means of conveyancethrough the unloading of the sheep for export to the United States, therehave been no other sheep aboard the means of conveyance.(b) <T3>Quarantine upon arrival. </T3>(1) As a condition of entry into theUnited States, upon arrival at the port of entry, sheep from New Zealandshall be quarantined for not less than 30 days, counting from the dateof entry into the approved quarantine facility.(2) In order to qualify for release from quarantine, the sheep shall betested as follows:(i) All sheep, except wethers and spayed females, shall be subjected twice,with an interval of at least 15 days between tests, to the standard directcomplement-fixation test for brucellosis variety ovis and receive negativetest results (less than fifty percent fixation, 2 plus) in a serum dilutionof 1:10; and(ii) All sheep shall test negative to any other test that may be determinednecessary by the Administrator to determine their freedom from communicablediseases. These tests may be duplicative of the tests required under paragraph(a) of this section or may be additional tests.(c) <T3>Sheep refused entry. </T3>A sheep imported or offered for entry intothe United States that is not accompanied by a health certificate as requiredby paragraph (a) of this section or that is found upon inspection at theport of entry to be affected with a communicable disease or to have beenexposed to a communicable disease, shall be refused entry and shall behandled thereafter in accordance with 21 U.S.C. 103 or quarantined, orotherwise disposed of as the Administrator may direct.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control number0579-0040)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 92.45</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Standards for approval of privately operated quarantine facilitiesfor sheep, and handling procedures for the importation of sheep.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Cooperative agreement. </T3>No facility shall operate as a privatelyoperated quaratine facility for sheep unless it is operated in accordancewith a cooperative agreement excuted by the operator or other designatedrepresentative of the facility and by the Administrator, and unless suchcooperative agreement includes all the requirements of this section andincludes a requirement that the cost of the facility and all costs associatedwith the maintenance and operation of the facility shall be borne by theoperator in accordance with the provisions of andSection; 92-12 of this part.(b) <T3>Approval of facilities. </T3>To qualify for designation as an approvedprivately operated quarantine facility \1\<NOTE/> and to retain such approval, the facility and its maintenanceand operation must meet the minimum requirements of this section. Approvalof any quarantine facility shall be contingent upon a determination bythe Administrator that adequate personnel are available to provide servicesrequired by the facility if approved. The cost of the facility and allcosts associated with the maintenance and operation of the facility shallbe borne by the operator in accordance with the provisions of andSection;92.12 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\1\ Information as to the identity of such facilities maybe obtained from the Administrator, Animal and Plant Health InspectionService, U.S. Departent of Agriculture, Washington, DC 20250.(1) <T3>Supervision of the facility. </T3>The facility shall be maintainedunder the supervision of a Veterinary Service veterinarian.(2) <T3>Physical plant requirements. </T3>The facility shall comply with thefollowing requirements:(i) <T3>Location. </T3>The quarantine facility shall:(A) Be located at one of the ports listed in andSection; 92.3(j) of thispart;(B) Be located within the immediate area of the port of entry to minimizethe possibility of introduction and dissemination of diseases by the importedsheep while in transit from the point of entry to the quarantine facility;and (C) Be located at least one-half mile from any livestock.(ii) <T3>Construction. </T3>The quarantine facility building shall:(A) Be constructed so that the surfaces of the floors and the surfacesof that part of the walls with which the sheep, their excrement, or dischargeshave contact are constructed of materials that are substantially imperviousto moisture and that can withstand continued cleaning and disinfection;(B) Be constructed so that the ceiling and that part of the walls withwhich the sheep, their excrement, or discharges do not have contact canwithstand cleaning and disinfection between shipments;(C) Be constructed with each entry way equipped with a series of two soliddoors, and with other openings covered with screening 16 mesh or finer;unless the Administrator specifically approves other types of doors andopenings as adequate to prevent the entry of insects;(D) Be constructed so that different lots of sheep in the facility at thesame time are separated by physical barriers in such a manner that sheepin a given lot do not have physical contact with sheep in another lot,or with their excrement, or discharges (for the purposes of this sectiona ``lot'' shall mean a group of sheep that have been held on a premiseswith opportunity for commingling (physical contact with other sheep inthe group or with their excrement of discharges) at any time since 30 daysprior to export to the United States);(E) Have a ventilation capacity sufficient to control moisture and odorat levels that are not injurious to the health of the sheep in quarantine;(F) Have a separate, controlled, forced air ventilation system for eachlot of sheep that is housed in the facility if the facility is approvedto handle more than one lot of sheep at a time;(G) Have a separate feed storage area, if feed is stored in the facility;(H) Have office space for recordkeeping available for use by VeterinaryServices personnel;(I) Have a necropsy area with facilities adequate for specimen preparationand equipped with a refrigerator-freezer for storing specimens for laboratoryexamination;(J) Have a separate area for washing clothes and equipment used in thefacility;(K) Have a shower at the entrance to the sheep-holding area and the necropsyarea and a clothes storage and change area at each end of the shower area;and(L) Have a storage area for equipment necessary for quarantine operations.(iii) <T3>Sanitation and security.</T3> Arrangements shall exist for:(A) Equipment and supplies necessary to maintain the facility in a cleanand sanitary condition, including insect and pest control equipment andsupplies;(B) Separately maintained equipment and supplies for each lot of animals;(C) A supply of potable water adequate to meet all watering and cleaningneeds;(D) Power cleaning and disinfecting equipment with adequate capacity todisinfect the facility and equipment;(E) Sufficient stocks of a disinfectant authorized in andSection;71.10 ofthis chapter;(F) Disposal of wastes by burial, incineration or in a public sewer systemin compliance with all applicable environmental quality control standards;(G) Upon the death or destruction of any sheep, disposal of the carcass,in conformance with all applicable environmental quality control standards,by incineration, by burial, or by storing the sheep carcasses in the facilityin a freezer at a temperature below 20 degrees Fahrenheit and upon releaseof the lot of sheep from the facility, disposing of any carcasses by grindingand then heating them for at least one hour at a temperature of not lessthan 265 degrees Fahrenheit;(H) Control of surface drainage into or from the facility in a manner adequateto prevent any significant risk of livestock diseases being spread intoor from the facility;(I) Protective clothing and footwear adequate in quantity to ensure thatworkers at the facility have clean clothing and footwear at the start ofeach workday and at any time such articles become soiled or contaminated;(J) A receptacle for soiled and contaminated clothing in the clothes changearea located nearest the entrance to the sheep-holding area;(K) A security system which prevents persons not authorized entry to thefacility and animals outside the facility from having contact with sheepin quarantine. Such a system shall include a daily log to record the entryand exit of all persons entering the facility; and(L) Feed and bedding for sheep in quarantine must originate in an areanot under quarantine because of cattle fever ticks (see Part 72 of thischapter) and must be stored in the facility in a manner which adequatelyprotects these supplies against infestation by vermin and against spoilage.(3) <T3>Operating procedures.</T3> To retain designation as an approved quarantinefacility, the following procedures shall be observed at the facility atall times:(i) <T3>Personnel.</T3> Access to the facility shall be granted only to personsworking at the facility or to persons specifically granted such accessby the Veterinary Services veterinarian.(A) All personnel granted access to the sheep-holding area shall:(<T3>1</T3>) Wear clean protective clothing and footwear upon entering thesheep-holding area;(<T3>2</T3>) Change protective clothing and footwear when they become soiledor contaminated;(<T3>3</T3>) Shower when entering and leaving the sheep-holding area;(<T3>4</T3>) Shower when leaving the necropsy area after conducting a necropsy;and(<T3>5</T3>) Be prohibited from having contact with any sheep other thanthe lot of sheep to which the person is assigned and be prohibited fromhaving contact with ruminants or swine outside the quarantine facility.(B) The operator of the facility shall handle soiled and contaminated clothingworn within the quarantine facility in a manner approved by the VeterinaryServices veterinarian as adequate to preclude transmission of any animaldisease agent from the facility.(ii) Any other person who enters the sheep-holding area, in addition tothose persons granted access in paragraph (b)(3)(i) of this section, shallbe prohibited from having contact with other lots of sheep within the facilityand with ruminants and swine outside the facility for a period of timedetermined by the supervising veterinarian as necessary to prevent a riskof spreading communicable livestock diseases.(iii) Any vehicle entering the quarantine facility building to deliverfeed shall be cleaned and disinfected under the supervision of a VeterinaryServices inspector with a disinfectant authorized in andSection; 71.10 ofthe regulations immediately before entering and before leaving the facility.(iv) <T3>Handling of the sheep in quarantine.</T3> The sheep in the quarantinefacility shall be handled in compliance with the following requirements:(A) Each lot of sheep to be quarantined shall be placed in the facilityon an ``all-in, all-out'' basis. No sheep shall be taken out of the lotwhile it is in quarantine except for diagnostic purposes and no sheep shallbe added to a lot while the lot is in quarantine.(B) The portion of the quarantine facility from which a lot of sheep hasbeen released shall be thoroughly cleaned and disinfected under supervisonof a Veterinary Services inspector with a disinfectant authorized in andSection;71.10 of this chapter, before a new lot is placed in that portion of thefacility.(v) <T3>Records.</T3> It shall be the responsibility of the supervisory veterinarianto maintain a current daily log for each lot of sheep, recording such informationas the individual identification of the sheep, source or origin of thesheep in the lot, total number of sheep in the lot when imported, numberof dead or injured sheep when the lot arrived, the date the lot was placedinto the facility, the general condition of the sheep each day, recordof any medications administered to the sheep, number of deaths each dayin the lot during the quarantine period, necropsy results, laboratory findingson sheep that died during the quarantine period, date of prescribed testsand results, Department import permit numbers of each lot, the date thelot was removed from the facility, and any other observations pertinentto the general health of the sheep in the lot. The operator of the facilityshall hold the log for 12 months following the date of release of the sheepfrom quarantine and shall make it available to Veterinary Services personnelupon request.(4) <T3>Environmental requirements.</T3> It shall be the responsibility ofthe operator of the facility to provide a certification executed by anappropriate government official indicating compliance with the applicablelaws for environmental protection.(5) <T3>Additional requirements.</T3> Additional requirements as to location,security, physical plant and facilities, sanitation, and other items maybe imposed by the Administrator in each specific case in order to assurethat the quarantine of the sheep in such facility will be adequate to enabledetermination of their health status, prevent spread of disease among sheepin quarantine, and prevent escape of animal disease agents from the facility.(c) <T3>Request for approval.</T3> Requests for approval of a privately operatedquarantine facility shall be made by writing to the Administrator, APHIS,USDA, 6505 Belcrest Road, Hyattsville, MD 20782. The request should includethe full name and mailing address of the applicant and the location andstreet address of the facility for which approval is sought. Requests forapproval and plans for proposed facilities shall be submitted no less than90 days before the proposed date of entry of the first lot of sheep intothe quarantine facility.(d) <T3>Withdrawal or denial of approval.</T3> (1) Approval of any facilitymay be refused and approval of any approved quarantine facility may bewithdrawn at any time by the Administrator, for any of the reasons providedin paragraph (d)(2) of this section. Before such action is taken, the operatorof the facility will be informed of the reasons for the proposed action.If there is a conflict as to any material fact, the operator, upon request,shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing with respect to the meritsor validity of such action, in accordance with rules of practice whichshall be adopted for the proceeding. However, such withdrawal shall becomeeffective pending final determination in the proceeding when the Administratordetermines that such action is necessary to protect the public health,interest, or safety. Such withdrawal shall be effective upon oral or writtennotification, whichever is earlier, to the operator of the facility. Inthe event of oral notification, written confirmation shall be given tothe operator of the facility as promptly as circumstances allow. This withdrawalshall continue in effect pending the completion of the proceeding and anyjudicial review, unless otherwise ordered by the Administrator. In additionto withdrawal or denial of approval when the requirements for approvalare not complied with, approval will be automatically withdrawn by theAdministrator when the operator of any approved facility notifies the AreaVeterinarian in Charge for the State in which the facility is located,in writing, that the facility is no longer in operation.\2\<NOTE/><ITAG tagnum="28"/><NOTE/>\2\ The name and address of the Veterinarian in Charge ofany State are available from the Administrator, APHIS, USDA, 6505 BelcrestRoad, Hyattsville, MD 20782.(2) Except as provided in paragraph (d)(4) of this section, the approvalof a privately operated quarantine facility for sheep may be denied orwithdrawn if:(i) Any requirement of this section is not complied with; or(ii) The operator or a person responsibly connected with the business ofthe quarantine facility is or has been convicted of any crime under anylaw regarding the importation or quarantine of any animal or bird; or (iii) The operator or a person responsibly connected with the businessof the quarantine facility is or has been convicted of any crime involvingfraud, bribery, or extortion or any other crime involving a lack of integrityneeded for the conduct of operations affecting the importation of animals;or (iv) The approved quarantine facility has not been used to quarantine sheepfor a period of one year.(3) For the purposes of this section, a person shall be deemed to be responsiblyconnected with the business of the quarantine facility if such person hasan ownership, mortgage, or lease interest in the facility's physical plant,or if such person is a partner, officer, director, holder or owner of 10per cent or more of its voting stock, or an employee in a managerial orexecutive capacity.(4) The denial or withdrawal referred to in paragraph (d)(2) of this sectionshall not be solely based upon the convictions of those persons responsiblyconnected with an approved privately operated quarantine facility for sheepif, after issuance of a complaint and upon receipt of notification fromthe Administrator of the denial or withdrawal, the operator of the approvedquarantine facility enters into a consent agreement with the Administrator,in which it is agreed that the responsibly connected person identifiedin the notification shall not ever be associated with the approved quarantinefacility and the operator complies with the provisions of the agreement.Violation of the consent agreement shall constitute independent groundsfor withdrawal of approval of an approved quarantine facility.<ITAG tagnum="20">(Approved by the Office of Management and Budget under control numbers0579-0040)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Done in Washington, DC, this 7th day of June, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">James W. Glosser,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Administrator, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-13164 Filed 6-9-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3410-34-M</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>